Utah statutes.
17B-1-635.   Duties with respect to issuance of checks.
(1)  The district clerk or other designated person not performing treasurer
duties shall prepare the necessary checks after having determined that:
(a)  the claim was authorized by:
(i)  the board of trustees; or
(ii)  the local district financial officer, if the financial officer is not
the clerk, in accordance with Section 17B-1-642;
(b)  the claim does not overexpend the appropriate departmental budget
established by the board of trustees; and
(c)  the expenditure was approved in advance by the board of trustees or its
designee.
(2) (a) (i)  The treasurer or any other person appointed by the board of
trustees shall sign all checks.
(ii)  The person maintaining the financial records may not sign any single
signature check.
(b)  In a local district with an expenditure budget of less than $50,000 per
year, a member of the board of trustees shall also sign all checks.
(c)  Before affixing a signature, the treasurer or other designated person
shall determine that a sufficient amount is on deposit in the appropriate bank
account of the district to honor the check.
